Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.15.821

Dual credit program—Definition.

As used in this chapter, "dual credit program" means a program, administered by either an institution of higher education or a high school, through which high school students in the eleventh or twelfth grade who have not yet received the credits required for the award of a high school diploma apply to a participating institution of higher education to enroll in courses or programs offered by the institution of higher education and simultaneously earn high school and college credit.

[ 2009 c 215 s 8.]

NOTES:

Findings—Intent—Effective date—2009 c 215: See notes following RCW 28B.92.030.